West Virginia, session 2025, HB2266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §11-16-22 of this code, modified by the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 3, 2024, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner (nonintoxicating beer licensing and operations procedures, 176 CSR 01), is authorized.